Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-32,114
Flood control improvement corridor; building permit requirement; applicability of sections.

Sections 2-32,109 to 2-32,112 shall only apply in counties, cities, or villages which have a requirement that a building permit be obtained prior to construction of a structure whether the requirement is adopted before, on, or after July 16, 1994.

Laws 1994, LB 480, § 21.